Maine, session 132, LD1337.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §4553, sub-§8, as amended by PL 2019, c. 464, §1, is further
amended by adding after the first blocked paragraph a new blocked paragraph to read:
"Place of public accommodation" does not include a facility, owned and operated by a
private entity, that provides emergency shelter to women or temporary residence to women
who are in reasonable fear of their safety.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §4602, sub-§5, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 366, §19, is
amended to read:
C. Requires a religious corporation, association or society that does not receive public
funding to comply with this section as it relates to sexual orientation or gender identity;
or
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §4602, sub-§5, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 366, §19, is
amended to read:
D. Requires an educational institution to participate in or endorse any religious beliefs
or practices; to the extent that an educational institution permits religious expression,
it cannot discriminate between religions in so doing.; or
Sec. 4. 5 MRSA §4602, sub-§5, ¶E is enacted to read:
E. May be construed to affect the rights of a female athlete under 20 United States
Code, Sections 1681 to 1689, also known as Title IX of the federal Education
Amendments of 1972, Public Law 92-318, as amended.